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DIC2G-02

DTC P0420 | Catalyst System Efficiency Below Threshold
(Bank 1)

DTC P0430 | Catalyst System Efficiency Below Threshold
(Bank 2)

HINT:

. IfDTC P0420is displayed, check the bank 1 catalyst.

. IfDTC P0430isdisplayed, checkthe bank 2 catalyst.

. Bank 1 includescylinderNo. 1,butbank2doesnot. Cylinder No. 1 islocated inthefrontpartofthe
engine, opposite the transmission.

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The ECMuses Heated Oxygen Sensors (HO2Ss) mounted before and after the three —-way catalyst (TWC)
tomonitorits’ efficiency. The front sensor sends pre —catalystair —fuelinformationtothe ECM. Therear sen-
sorsends post -catalystinformationtothe ECM. The ECM comparesthesetwo signalsto judge the efficien-
cy of the catalyst and the catalyst’s ability to store oxygen. During normal operation, the TWC stores and
releases oxygen as needed. The capacity to store oxygen resultsin alow variation inthe post -TWC exhaust
stream as shown on the next page.
If the catalyst is functioning normally, the waveform of the HO2S (sensor 2) slowly switches between RICH
and LEAN. If the catalyst is deteriorated, the waveform will alternate frequently between RICH and LEAN.
As the catalyst efficiency degrades, its ability to store oxygen is reduced and the catalyst output becomes
more variable.
When running the catalyst monitor, the ECM begins to measure the signal length of the HO2S (sensor 1)
and HO2S (sensor 2). The ECM calculates the rate of signal length of the HO2S (sensor 1) and HO2S (sen-
sor 2) (catalyst deterioration level). If the catalyst deterioration level exceeds the threshold, the ECM inter-
prets this as a catalyst malfunction. The ECM illuminates the MIL (2 trip detection logic) and sets a DTC.
The monitor runs after:

«  Theengineiswarmedup (Engine Coolant Temperature (ECT) is 75 "C (167[F) ormore).

«  Thevehicleisdrivenatapproximately 60to 100km/h (37 to 63 mph) for 15 minutes.
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DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
After engine and catalyst are warmed up, and while vehicle is
) . . . » Gasleakage on exhaust system
P0420 drivenwithin setvehicle and engine speed range; Waveforms Heated (bank 1,2 12)
* Heated oxygen sensor (ban ,2sensor 1,
P0430 ofrear HO2S alternates frequency between Rich and Lean ¥g .
. . ) * Three-way catalytic converter
(2 trip detection logic)
HINT:
. Bank 1 referstothe bankthatincludes cylinder No. 1.
. Bank 2referstothe bankthatdoes notinclude cylinder No. 1.

Sensor 1 referstothe sensorclosesttothe engine assembly.

Sensor 2referstothe sensorfarthestaway fromthe engine assembily.
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CONFIRMATION ENGINE RACING PATTERN
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(a) Connectthehand -heldtestertothe DLCS, orconnectthe probe ofthe oscilloscope betweenterminals
OXL1,0XL2,0XR 1,0XR2andE 1 oftheengine control ECU connector.
(b) Start the engine and warm it up with all accessories switched OFF until engine coolant temperature

is stable.

(c) Racetheengineat2,500 - 3,000 rpmforabout3minutes.
(d) After confirming thatthe waveform ofthe heated oxygen sensor (bank 1,2sensor 1 (OX1A,OX2A)),
oscillate around 0.5 V during feedback to the engine control ECU, check the waveform of the heated

oxygensensor (bank 1,2sensor2(0OX 1B,0X2B)).
. . HINT:
OX Signal Waveform (Oscilloscope) If there is a malfunction in the system, the waveform of the
1.0V = PP heated oxygensensor (bank 1,2sensor2(OX 1B,0X2B))is
vﬁhl\,_ | [ almostthe same as that ofthe heated oxygen sensor (bank 1,
MU RN IRNANA 2sensor 1 (OX1A, OX2A)) onthelett.
J ] \f’ There are some cases where, even though a malfunction ex-
S o T 2 ists, the MIL may either light up or not light up.
]
200 msec./Division Flos1a
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:

Read freeze frame data using the hand-held tester. Freeze frame data records the engine conditions when
a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, freeze frame data can help determine if the vehicle was
running or stopped, if the engine was warmed up or not, if the air-fuel ratio was lean or rich, as well as other
data from the time when a malfunction occurred.

1 Are there any other codes (besides DTC P0420 or P0430) being output?

PREPARATION:

(@) Connect the hand-held tester to the DLCS.

(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON and push the hand-held tester main switch ON.

()  When using hand-held tester, enter the following menus: DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / DTC INFO /

CURRENT CODES.

CHECK:

Read the DTC using the hand-held tester.

RESULT:
Display (DTC Output) Proceed to
"P0420 and/or P0430” A

"P0420 or P0430” and other DTCs B
HINT:

If any other codes besides "P0420 and/or P0430” are output, perform the troubleshooting for those DTCs
first.

=

2 [ Check gas leakage on exhaust system.

@

3Check heated oxygensensor (bank 1,2sensor 1).

B > Go to relevant DTC chart (See page DI-19).

NG> Repair or replace exhaust gas leakage point.

HINT:
Refer to the hint following the end of this flowchart.
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NG> Replace heated oxygen sensor.
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4 | Check heated oxygen sensor (bank 1, 2 sensor 2).

HINT:
Refer to the hint following the end of this flowchart.

Replace the front and rear three—way catalyt-
ic converter in the bank a malfunction is de-
tected.

NG> Replace heated oxygen sensor.

HINT:
Hand-held tester only:
The narrowing down the trouble area is possible by performing ACTIVE TEST of the following "A/F CON-
TROL" (Heated oxygen sensor or another can be distinguished).
(@) Perform ACTIVE TEST by hand-held tester (A/F CONTROL).
HINT:
"A/F CONTROL" is the ACTIVE TEST which changes the injection volume to —-12.5 % or +25 %.
(1) Connect the hand-held tester to the DLC3 on the vehicle.
(2) Turn the ignition switch ON.
(3) Warm up the engine with the engine speed at 2,500 rpm for approximately 90 seconds.
(4) Select the item "DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / ACTIVE TEST / A/IF CONTROL".
(5) Perform "A/F CONTROL” with the engine in an idle condition (press the right or left button).
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RESULT:
Heated oxygen sensor reacts in accordance with increase and decrease of injection volume
+25 % — rich output: More than 0.55V
-12.5 % — lean output: Less than 0.4V

NOTICE:

However, there is a few second delay in the sensor 1 (front sensor) output. And there is a maximum

20 seconds delay in the sensor 2 (rear sensor).

Output voltage of heated oxygen
sensor (sensor 1: front sensor)

Output voltage of heated oxygen
sensor (sensor 2: rear sensor)

Mainly suspect
trouble area

Case 1l

Injection volume
+25 % * _____
-12.5%

Output voltage

More than 0.55 V
Less than 0.4 V

OK

Injection volume
+25 % * _____
-125%

Output voltage

More than 0.5V
Less than 0.4 V

_/ /oK

Case 2

Injection volume

+25 % * _____
-12.5%

Output voltage

NG

Almost no reaction

Injection volume

+25 % * _____
-125%

Output voltage

More than 0.5 V
Less than 0.4 V

_/ /oK

Sensor 1: front sensor
(sensor 1, heater, sensor 1
circuit)

Case 3

Injection volume

+25 % * _____
-125%

Output voltage

More than 0.55 V

Injection volume

+25 % * _____
-12.5%

Output voltage

Sensor 2: rear sensor
(sensor 2, heater, sensor 2
circuit)

Less than 0.4 V OK | Almost no reaction NG
Injection volume Injection volume _
+25 9% * +25 % * Extremely rich or lean of the
1250 ¥ —7 L7 7 1250, 1 ——17 L2777 actual air-fuel ratio
Case 4 | Qutput voltage Output voltage (Injector, fuel pressure, gas
leakage in exhaust system,
Almost no reaction NG | Almost no reaction NG| etc.)

The following A/F CONTROL procedure enables the technician to check and graph the voltage output of
the heated oxygen sensors (sensor 1 and 2).
For displaying the graph indication, enter "ACTIVE TEST / A/lF CONTROL / USER DATA” then select "O2S
B1S1 and O2S B1S2” by pressing "YES” button and push "ENTER” button before pressing "F4” button.

NOTICE:
If the vehicle is short of fuel, the air—fuel ratio becomes LEAN and DTCs P0133 and/or P0153 will be
recorded, and the MIL then comes on.

S Read freeze frame data using the hand—held tester. Freeze frame data records the engine conditions
when a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, it is useful for determining whether the vehicle
was running or stopped, the engine was warmed up or not, the air—fuel ratio was lean or rich, etc. at
the time of the malfunction.

S A high heated oxygen sensor (sensor 1) voltage (0.55 V or more) could be caused by a rich air fuel
mixture. Check for conditions that would cause the engine to run rich.
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S Alow heated oxygen sensor (sensor 1) voltage (0.4 V or less) could be caused by a lean air fuel mix-
ture. Check for conditions that would cause the engine to run lean.
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